Utah statutes.
41-23-2.   Text.
The text of this agreement is as follows:
MULTISTATE HIGHWAY TRANSPORTATION AGREEMENT
Pursuant to and in conformity with the laws of their respective jurisdictions,
the participating jurisdictions, acting by and through their officials
lawfully authorized to execute this agreement, do mutually agree as follows:
ARTICLE I
Findings and Purposes
Section 1. Findings. The participating jurisdictions find that:
(a)  The expanding regional economy depends on expanding transportation
capacity;
(b)  Highway transportation is the major mode for movement of people and goods
in the western states;
(c)  Uniform application in the West of more adequate vehicle size and weight
standards will result in a reduction of pollution, congestion, fuel
consumption, and related transportation costs, which are necessary to permit
increased productivity;
(d)  A number of western states, already having adopted substantially the 1964
Bureau of Public Roads recommended vehicle size and weight standards, still
find current federal limits more restrictive; and
(e)  The participating jurisdictions are most capable of developing vehicle
size and weight standards most appropriate for their economy and
transportation requirements, consistent with and in recognition of principles
of highway safety.
Section 2. Purposes. The purposes of this agreement are to:
(a)  Adhere to the principle that each participating jurisdiction should have
the freedom to develop vehicle size and weight standards that it determines to
be most appropriate to its economy and highway system.
(b)  Establish a system recommending the operation of vehicles traveling
between two or more participating jurisdictions at more adequate size and
weight standards.
(c)  Promote uniformity among participating jurisdictions in vehicle size and
weight standards on the basis of the objectives set forth in this agreement.
(d)  Secure uniformity insofar as possible, of administrative procedures in
the enforcement of recommended vehicle size and weight standards.
(e)  Provide means for the encouragement and utilization of research which
will facilitate the achievement of the foregoing purposes, with due regard for
the findings set forth in section 1 of this article.
(f)  Study and recommend appropriate highway user fees.
(g)  Facilitate communication between legislators, state transportation
administrators, and commercial industry representatives in addressing the
emerging highway transportation issues in participating jurisdictions.
ARTICLE II
Definitions
Section 1. As used in this agreement:
(a)  "Cooperating Committee" means a body composed of the designated
representatives from the participating jurisdictions.
(b)  "Designated representative" means a legislator or other person authorized
under Article XII to represent the jurisdiction.
(c)  "Jurisdiction" means a state of the United States or the District of
Columbia.
(d)  "Vehicle" means any vehicle as defined by statute to be subject to size
and weight standards which operates in two or more participating
jurisdictions.
ARTICLE III
General Provisions
Section 1. Qualifications for Membership. Participation in this agreement is
open to jurisdictions which subscribe to the findings, purposes, and
objectives of this agreement and will seek legislation necessary to accomplish
these objectives.
Section 2. Cooperation. The participating jurisdictions, working through their
designated representatives, shall cooperate and assist each other in achieving
the desired goals of this agreement pursuant to appropriate statutory
authority.
Section 3. Effect of Headings. Article and section headings contained herein
shall not be deemed to govern, limit, modify, or in any manner affect the
scope, meaning, or intent of the provisions of any article or section hereof.
Section 4. Vehicle Laws and Regulations. This agreement shall not authorize
the operation of a vehicle in any participating jurisdiction contrary to the
laws or regulations thereof.
Section 5. Interpretation. The final decision regarding interpretation of
questions at issue relating to this agreement shall be reached by unanimous
joint action of the participating jurisdictions, acting through the designated
representatives. Results of all such actions shall be placed in writing.
Section 6. Amendment. This agreement may be amended by unanimous joint action
of the participating jurisdictions, acting through the officials thereof
authorized to enter into this agreement, subject to the requirements of
section 4, article III. Any amendment shall be placed in writing and become a
part hereof.
Section 7. Restrictions, Conditions or Limitations. Any jurisdiction entering
this agreement shall provide each other participating jurisdiction with a list
of any restriction, condition or limitation on the general terms of this
agreement, if any.
Section 8. Additional Jurisdictions. Additional jurisdictions may become
members of this agreement by signing and accepting the terms of the agreement.
ARTICLE IV
Cooperating Committee
Section 1. Each participating jurisdiction shall have two designated
representatives.  Pursuant to section 2, article III, the designated
representatives of the participating jurisdictions shall constitute the
Cooperating Committee which shall have the power to:
(a)  Collect, correlate, analyze, and evaluate information resulting or
derivable from research and testing activities in relation to vehicle size and
weight related matters.
(b)  Recommend and encourage the undertaking of research and testing in any
aspect of vehicle size and weight or related matter when, in their collective
judgment, appropriate or sufficient research or testing has not been
undertaken.
(c)  Recommend changes in law or policy with emphasis on compatibility of laws
and uniformity of administrative rules or regulations which would promote
effective governmental action or coordination in the field of vehicle size and
weight related matters.
(d)  Recommend improvements in highway operations, in vehicular safety, and in
state administration of highway transportation laws.
(e)  Perform functions necessary to facilitate the purposes of this agreement.
Section 2. Each designated representative of a participating jurisdiction
shall be entitled to one vote only. No action of the committee shall be
approved unless a majority of the total number of votes cast by the designated
representatives of the participating jurisdictions are in favor of the action.
Section 3. The committee shall meet at least once annually and shall elect,
from among its members, a chairman, a vice-chairman, and a secretary.
Section 4. The committee shall submit annually to the legislature of each
participating jurisdiction a report setting forth the work of the committee
during the preceding year and including recommendations developed by the
committee. The committee may submit such additional reports as it deems
appropriate or desirable.
ARTICLE V
Objectives of the Participating Jurisdictions
Section 1. Objectives. The participating jurisdictions hereby declare that:
(a)  It is the objective of the participating jurisdictions to obtain more
efficient and more economical transportation by motor vehicles between and
among the participating jurisdictions by encouraging the adoption of standards
that will, as minimums, allow the operation on all state highways, except
those determined through engineering evaluation to be inadequate, with a
single-axle weight of 20,000 pounds, a tandem-axle weight of 34,000 pounds,
and a gross vehicle or combination weight not in excess of that resulting from
application of the formula:
W=500 {LN/(N-1) + 12N+36}
where W = maximum weight in pounds carried on any group of two or more
consecutive axles computed to nearest 500 pounds.
L = distance in feet between the extremes of any group of two or more
consecutive axles.
N = number of axles in group under consideration.
(b)  It is the further objective of the participating jurisdictions that the
operation of a vehicle or combination of vehicles in interstate commerce
according to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section be authorized
under special permit authority by each participating jurisdiction for vehicle
combinations in excess of statutory weights of 80,000 pounds or statutory
lengths.
(c)  It is the further objective of the participating jurisdictions to
facilitate and expedite the operation of any vehicle or combination of
vehicles between and among the participating jurisdictions under the
provisions of subsection (a) or (b) of this section, and to that end the
participating jurisdictions hereby agree, through their designated
representatives, to meet and cooperate in the consideration of vehicle size
and weight related matters including, but not limited to, the development of:
uniform enforcement procedures; additional vehicle size and weight standards;
operational standards; agreements or compacts to facilitate regional
application and administration of vehicle size and weight standards; uniform
permit procedures; uniform application forms; rules and regulations for the
operation of vehicles, including equipment requirements, driver
qualifications, and operating practices; and such other matters as may be
pertinent.
(d) The Cooperating Committee may recommend that the participating
jurisdictions jointly secure congressional approval of this agreement and,
specifically of the vehicle size and weight standards set forth in subsection
(a) of this section.
(e)  It is the further objective of the participating jurisdictions to:
(1)  Establish transportation laws and regulations to meet regional and
economic needs and to promote an efficient, safe, and compatible
transportation network;
(2)  Develop standards that facilitate the most efficient and environmentally
sound operation of vehicles on highways, consistent with and in recognition of
principles of highway safety; and
(3)  Establish programs to increase productivity and reduce congestion, fuel
consumption, and related transportation costs and enhance air quality through
the uniform application of state vehicle regulations and laws.
ARTICLE VI
Entry Into Force and Withdrawal
Section 1. This agreement shall enter into force when enacted into law by any
two or more jurisdictions. Thereafter, this agreement shall become effective
as to any other jurisdiction upon its enactment thereof, except as otherwise
provided in section 8, article III.
Section 2. Any participating jurisdiction may withdraw from this agreement by
cancelling the same but no such withdrawal shall take effect until 30 days
after the designated representative of the withdrawing jurisdiction has given
notice in writing of the withdrawal to all other participating jurisdictions.
ARTICLE VII
Construction and Severability
Section 1. This agreement shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the
purposes thereof.
Section 2. The provisions of this agreement shall be severable and if any
phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this agreement is declared to be
contrary to the constitution of any participating jurisdiction or the
applicability thereto to any government, agency, person or circumstance is
held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this agreement shall not be
affected thereby. If this agreement shall be held contrary to the constitution
of any jurisdiction participating herein, the agreement shall remain in full
force and effect as to the jurisdictions affected as to all severable matters.
ARTICLE VIII
Filing of Documents
Section 1. A copy of this agreement, its amendments, and rules or regulations
adopted thereunder and interpretations thereof shall be filed in the highway
department in each participating jurisdiction and shall be made available for
review by interested parties.
ARTICLE IX
Existing Statutes Not Repealed
Section 1. All existing statutes prescribing weight and size standards and all
existing statutes relating to special permits shall continue to be of force
and effect until amended or repealed by law.
ARTICLE X
State Government Departments
Authorized to Cooperate with Cooperating Committee
Section 1. Within appropriations available therefor, the departments, agencies
and officers of the government of this state shall cooperate with and assist
the Cooperating Committee within the scope contemplated by article IV, section
1 (a) and (b) of the agreement. The departments, agencies and officers of the
government of this state are authorized generally to cooperate with said
Cooperating Committee.
ARTICLE XI
Funding Section
Section 1.  Funds for the administration of this agreement, including
participation in the Cooperating Committee and the actual expenses of the
designated representatives, shall be budgeted or expensed as determined
appropriate.
ARTICLE XII
Selection of Designated Representatives
Section 1.  The process for selecting the designated representatives to the
Cooperating Committee shall be established by law under this section.
Section 2.  The persons authorized to represent the state of Utah as the
designated representatives to the committee shall be the chairperson of the
Senate Transportation Committee and the chairperson of the House
Transportation Committee or a legislator or a state agency official that the
chairperson assigns.
Section 3.  The transportation chairpersons in each house shall also designate
one alternative designated representative who shall also be a legislator or
state agency official to serve in their absence.
